Utah statutes.
31A-32a-107.   Penalties for noncompliance with tax provisions.
(1)  An account administrator who fails to comply with a provision described
in Subsection (2) is subject to:
(a)  the civil penalties provided in Section 59-1-401; and
(b)  interest at the rate and in the manner provided in Section 59-1-402.
(2)  The following provisions apply to Subsection (1):
(a)  a provision of this chapter relating to:
(i)  an addition to income made in accordance with Section 59-10-114; or
(ii)  a tax credit allowed by Section 59-10-1021; or
(b)  a provision of Title 59, Chapter 10, Individual Income Tax Act, relating
to:
(i)  an addition to income made in accordance with Section 59-10-114; or
(ii)  a tax credit allowed by Section 59-10-1021.
